Tennessee, session 114, HB1280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) There is created within the state general fund a special account to be known
as the medical expense relief fund. The purpose of this fund is to assist the next of kin
and the estate of a decedent who was enrolled in TennCare at the time of death with
paying the decedent's medical debt and expenses, including the payment of medical
assistance benefits, premiums, or other costs due from the estate under § 71-5-116 and
federal law.
(b) The department of human services shall administer the fund and establish
procedures for the next of kin or the estate of a decedent who was enrolled in TennCare
at the time of death to apply for grants awarded pursuant to this section. The
procedures must include, but are not limited to:
(1) Application requirements and deadlines to apply for grants;
(2) Criteria for awarding grants, which allow the department to consider
factors such as the amount of the decedent's medical debt and expenses and
demonstrated need of the decedent's next of kin and estate;
(3) Criteria for determining whether to award a grant to the next of kin,
the legal representative of the decedent's estate, or directly to the creditor or
creditors to whom the obligation is owed; and
HB1280
001412
- 1 -

(4) Reporting requirements for recipients who receive grants to ensure
accountability and measure program effectiveness.
(c) The next of kin or the legal representative of the estate of a decedent who
was enrolled in TennCare at the time of death may apply for grant funds under this
section. The department shall make available to such persons a method of submitting
an application for a grant and provide assistance, if requested, to the eligible recipient in
completing the application and submitting supporting documentation. The department
shall require an applicant to provide documentation of the decedent's unpaid medical
debt and expenses, including the payment of medical assistance benefits, premiums, or
other costs due from the estate under § 71-5-116 and federal law.
(d) Subject to available funds, the department shall allocate and disperse grants
from the fund to eligible recipients identified by the department from those described in
subdivision (b)(3). Grant funds must be expended only for the decedent's medical debt
and expenses, including the payment of medical assistance benefits, premiums, or other
costs due from the estate under § 71-5-116 and federal law.
(e) It is the general assembly's intent that the fund consists of an initial
appropriation of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) from the general fund.
(f) Unless otherwise specified in this section, moneys deposited in the fund must
be used only to implement and administer the purposes set forth in this section. In
addition to appropriations made to the fund, the department may accept other funds,
public or private, by way of gift or grant to the fund. A gift or grant must be deposited
into the fund to be expended in accordance with this section.
(g) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund for the benefit of the fund
in accordance with § 9-4-603. Interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund
must be credited to and remain part of the fund.
- 2 - 001412

(h) Any balance remaining unexpended at the end of a fiscal year in the fund
must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.
(i) The department shall promulgate rules necessary to effectuate this section.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4,chapter 5.
(j) All expenditures from the fund are subject to review in the form of an annual
report submitted by the commissioner of human services to the chair of the finance,
ways and means committee of the senate and the chair of the committee of the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over budget-related matters.
SECTION 2. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds must not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 001412